Missouri, session 2026, SB1225.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.045, to read as
follows:
1.045. 1. This section is known and may be cited as
the "Restoring State Sovereignty Through Nullification Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Federal action", includes federal law; a federal
agency rule, policy, or standard; an executive order of the
President of the United States; an order or decision of a
federal court; and the making or enforcing of a treaty;
(2) "Unconstitutional federal action", a federal
action enacted, adopted, or implemented without authority
specifically delegated to the federal government by the
people and the states through the United States Constitution.
3. This section contemplates the review of any federal
action to determine whether the action is an
unconstitutional federal action. When evaluating a federal
action, the general assembly shall consider the plain
reading and reasoning of the text of the United States
Constitution and the understood definitions at the time of

SB 1225 2
the framing and construction of the Constitution by the
framers before making a final declaration of
constitutionality, as demonstrated by:
(1) The ratifying debates in the several states;
(2) The understanding of the leading participants at
the constitutional convention;
(3) The understanding of the doctrine in question by
the constitutions of the several states in existence at the
time the United States Constitution was adopted;
(4) The understanding of the United States
Constitution by the first United States Congress;
(5) The opinions of the first chief justice of the
United States Supreme Court;
(6) The background understanding of the doctrine in
question under the English Constitution of the time; and
(7) The statements of support for natural law and
natural rights by the framers and the philosophers admired
by the framers.
4. It is declared that federal laws, federal executive
actions, and federal court opinions shall comply with the
jurisdictional limitations of the United States
Constitution. It is further declared that any federal
action outside the enumerated powers set forth in the United
States Constitution are in violation of the peace and safety
of the people of this state, and therefore, said acts are
declared void and must be resisted.
5. The proper manner of resistance is a state action
of nullification of the federal action.
6. (1) Nullification is the process whereby this
state makes an official declaration that:
(a) A specific federal action has exceeded the
prescribed authority under the United States Constitution;

SB 1225 3
(b) That said action, as being ultra vires, will not
be recognized as valid within the bounds of this state;
(c) That said action, as being ultra vires, is null
and void in this state;
(d) That an officeholder, agency, or public employee,
whether state or a political subdivision serving under the
authority of the Constitution of Missouri shall not assist
in any attempted enforcement of said federal action; and
(e) That state or local funds shall not be used to
assist in any attempted enforcement of said federal action.
(2) The general assembly has sole authority to
prescribe the crimes, penalties, fines, or other
consequences of the violation of a bill of nullification by
any person found within the boundary of this state. Such
consequences must be specified in the bill of nullification
before a final vote is taken on its passage.
7. State nullification of federal action may be
accomplished in any of the following ways:
(1) Any member of the general assembly may introduce a
bill of nullification in the general assembly. Such bill
shall be acted upon in the same manner as any other
legislative bill;
(2) Any court of competent jurisdiction may render a
finding or a holding of nullification in any case of which
it otherwise has proper venue and jurisdiction, wherein the
parties to said case will, upon final judgment, be bound
thereby in the same manner as in other cases.
8. Regarding the same federal action, a bill of
nullification shall not be considered by the general
assembly more than once each year. If said bill fails, then
it may be considered again in any succeeding year, but not
more than once per year. If said bill passes, then the

SB 1225 4
provisions of subsection 6 of this section shall become
effective with regard to such federal action.
✓